North Dakota, session 69, HB1570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Tobacco tax distribution behavioral health fund.
The tobacco tax distribution behavioral health fund is created as a special fund in the state
treasury. The fund consists of all tobacco tax collections deposited in the fund under sections 4
and 5 of this Act. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the department shall use the
moneys in the fund to provide for depression and anxiety behavioral health services by the
regional human service centers. The moneys must be distributed to the human service centers
based upon the number of individuals served, and may be used to contract with providers in the
community to provide services under this section, with priority to those in financial need. The
department may adopt rules to administer the fund.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
Page No. 1 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. "Alternative tobacco product" means a noncombustible product containing nicotine or
synthetic nicotine, intended for human consumption by chewing, absorbing, dissolving,
or any other means.
a. The term includes:
(1) Nicotine gels;
(2) Nicotine pouches; and
(3) Dissolvable tobacco products.
b. The term does not include products approved by the United States food and drug
administration for nicotine replacement therapy.
2. "Chewing tobacco" means any leaf tobacco that is intended to be placed in the mouth.
2.3. "Cigar" means any roll of tobacco wrapped in tobacco.
3.4. "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco or processed
tobacco and encased in any material except tobacco. The term also means any
product of a cigarette-making machine.
4.5. "Cigarette-making machine" means a machine used for commercial purposes to
process tobacco into a roll or tube, formed or made from any material other than
tobacco, at a production rate of more than five rolls or tubes per minute.
5.6. "Consumer" means any person who has title to or possession of cigarettes, cigars,
pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products in storage, for
use or other consumption in this state.
6.7. "Dealer" includes a retailer and any person other than a distributor who is engaged in
the business of selling cigarettes, cigarette papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic
smoking devices, or other tobacco products, or any product of a cigarette-making
machine.
7.8. "Distributor" includes any person engaged in the business of producing or
manufacturing cigarettes, cigarette papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking
devices, or other tobacco products, or importing into this state cigarettes, cigarette
papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products,
for the purpose of distribution and sale thereof to dealers and retailers. The term also
includes a dealer that fabricates, repackages, compounds, or mixes electronic
smoking devices for purposes of sale to a consumer.
Page No. 2 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
8.9. "Electronic smoking device" means a device that may be used to deliver an
aerosolized, vaporized, or heated substance containing nicotine, regardless of
whether the nicotine is natural or synthetic, to an individual inhaling from the device,
and includes an electronic cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, and e-hookah. The
term includes any substance containing nicotine, regardless of whether the nicotine is
natural or synthetic, that may be aerosolized, vaporized, or heated by the device,
regardless of whether the device is sold separately. The term does not include:
a. A cigarette as defined in section 51-25-01;
b. A cigarette as defined in this section;
c. A drug, device, or combination product, as those terms are defined in the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [52 Stat. 1040; 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.], approved
for sale by the United States food and drug administration; or
d. A battery or battery charger when sold separately.
9.10. "Licensed dealer" means a dealer licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
10.11. "Licensed distributor" means a distributor licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
11.12. "Other tobacco products" means snuff and chewing tobacco.
12.13. "Outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco products are sold.
13.14. "Person" means any individual, firm, fiduciary, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, trust, or association however formed.
14.15. "Pipe tobacco" means any processed tobacco that, because of its appearance, type,
packaging, or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by,
consumers as tobacco to be smoked in a pipe.
15.16. "Place of business" means a place where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco
products are manufactured, fabricated, stored, or kept for purposes of sale or
consumption.
16.17. "Retailer" means a person engaged in the business of selling cigarettes, cigars, pipe
tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products to consumers.
17.18. "Sale" or "sell" applies to gifts, exchanges, and barter.
18.19. "Snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is intended to be
placed in the mouth or nose.
Page No. 3 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
19.20. "Storage" means any keeping or retention of cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco,
electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products for use or consumption in this
state.
20.21. "Use" means the exercise of any right or power incidental to the ownership or
possession of cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other
tobacco products.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-25 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-25. Cigars and pipe tobacco - Excise tax on wholesale purchase price - Other
tobacco products - Excise tax on weight - Penalty - Reports - Collection - Allocation of
revenue.
1. There is hereby levied and assessed upon all cigars and pipe tobacco sold in this
state an excise tax at the rate of twenty-eight percent of the wholesale purchase price
at which suchthe cigars and pipe tobacco are purchased by distributors. For the
purposes of this section, the term "wholesale purchase price" shall meanmeans the
established price for which a manufacturer sells cigars or pipe tobacco to a distributor
exclusive of any discount or other reduction.
2. There is levied and assessed upon all other tobacco products sold in this state an
excise tax at the following rates:
a. Upon each can or package of snuff, sixty one dollar and ninty - six cents per ounce
and a proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce.
b. On chewing tobacco, sixteen fifty - two cents per ounce and a proportionate tax at
the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce.
For purposes of this subsection, the tax on other tobacco products is computed based
on the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
3. The proceeds of the taxes imposed under this section, together with suchthe forms of
return and in accordance with suchthe rules and regulations as the tax commissioner
may prescribe, shall be remitted to the tax commissioner by the distributor on a
calendar quarterly basis on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the
quarterly period for which paid. The tax commissioner shall, however, have authority
tomay prescribe monthly returns upon the request of the licensee distributor and
Page No. 4 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
suchthe returns accompanied with remittance shallmust be filed before the fifteenth
day of the month following the month for which the returns are filed.
4. Any person failing to file any prescribed form or return or to pay any tax within the time
required or permitted by this section is subject to a penalty of five percent of the
amount of tax due or five dollars, whichever is greater, plus interest of one percent of
the tax per month or fraction of a month of delay except the first month after the return
or the tax became due. The tax commissioner, if satisfied that the delay was
excusable, may waive all or any part of the penalty. The penalty must be paid to the
tax commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as are other receipts under this
chapter.
5. All moneys received by the tax commissioner under the provisions of this section shall
be transmitted to the state treasurer at the end of each month and deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the general fund.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-26. Cigars, pipe tobacco, and other tobacco products - Excise tax payable by
dealers - Reports - Penalties - Collection - Allocation of revenue.
1. There is levied and assessed, upon all cigars and pipe tobacco purchased in another
state and brought into this state by a dealer for the purpose of sale at retail, an excise
tax at the rate of twenty-eight percent of the wholesale purchase price and, upon all
other tobacco products purchased in another state and brought into this state by a
dealer for the purpose of sale at retail, an excise tax at the rates indicated in section
57-36-25, at the time the products were brought into this state. For the purposes of
this section, the term "wholesale purchase price" means the established price for
which a manufacturer sells cigars or pipe tobacco to a distributor exclusive of any
discount or other reduction. However, the dealer may elect to report and remit the tax
on the cost price of the products to the dealer rather than on the wholesale purchase
price. The proceeds of the tax, together with the forms of return and in accordance
with any rules and regulations the tax commissioner may prescribe, must be remitted
to the tax commissioner by the dealer on a monthly basis on or before the fifteenth day
of the month following the monthly period for which it is paid. The tax commissioner
Page No. 5 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
shall have the authority tomay place any dealer on an annual remittance basis when in
the judgment of the tax commissioner the operations of the dealer merit that
remittance period. In addition, the tax commissioner shall have the authority tomay
permit the consolidation of the filing of a dealer's return when the dealer has more
than one location and thereby would be required to file more than one return.
2. If cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products have been subjected already to a tax
by any other state in respect to their sale in an amount less than the tax imposed by
this section, the provisions of this section apply, but at a rate measured by the
difference only between the rate fixed in this section and the rate by which the
previous tax upon the sale was computed. If the tax imposed in the other state is
twenty percent of the wholesale purchase price or more, then no tax is due on the
article. The provisions of this subsection apply only if the other state allows a tax credit
with respect to the excise tax on cigars, pipe tobacco, or other tobacco products
imposed by this state which is substantially similar in effect to the credit allowed by this
subsection.
3. Any person failing to file any prescribed forms of return or to pay any tax within the
time required by this section is subject to a penalty of five dollars or a sum equal to
five percent of the tax due, whichever is greater, plus one percent of the tax for each
month of delay or fraction thereof excepting the month within which the return was
required to be filed or the tax became due. The tax commissioner, if satisfied that the
delay was excusable, may waive all or any part of the penalty. The penalty must be
paid to the tax commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as are other
receipts under this chapter.
4. All moneys received by the tax commissioner under the provisions of this section must
be transmitted to the state treasurer at the end of each month and deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the general fund.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-31 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 6 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
57-36-31. Transfer and allocation of revenues - Appropriation.
1. All moneys received by the tax commissioner under the provisions of this chapter must
be transmitted to the state treasurer at the end of each month and deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the general fund, except as hereinafter provided.
2. All moneys received from the levy and assessment of one and one-half mills on each
of the classes of cigarettes provided in this chapter are appropriated and must be
distributed on or before the thirtieth day of June and the thirty-first day of December of
each year on a per capita basis to the incorporated cities for suchthe purposes as are
now or may be hereafter authorized by law, the allocation to be based upon the
population of each incorporated city according to the last official federal census, or the
census taken in accordance with the provisions of chapter 40-02 in the case of a city
incorporated subsequent to the last federal census, and warrants must be drawn
payable to the treasurers of such cities.
3. All moneys received from an amount equal to a ninety - eight cents tax levied and
assessed per ounce of snuff under section 57 - 36 - 25, a twenty - six cent tax levied and
assessed per ounce of chewing tobacco under section 57 - 36 - 25, a twenty - eigh t
percent tax levied and assessed on the wholesale purchase price of electronic
smoking devices under section 7 of this Act, and a twenty-eight percent tax levied and
assessed on the wholesale purchase price of alternative tobacco products under
section 8 of this Act must be deposited by the state treasurer in the tobacco tax
distribution behavioral health fund under section 1 of this Act .
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-32. Separate and additional tax on the sale of cigarettes - Collection -
Allocation of revenue - Tax avoidance prohibited.
1. There is hereby levied and assessed and there shallmust be collected by the state tax
commissioner and paid to the state treasurer, upon allon cigarettes sold in this state,
an additional tax, separate and apart from all other taxes, of seventeen mills on each
cigarette, to be collected as existing taxes on cigarettes sold are, or hereafter may be,
collected, by use of appropriate stamps and under similar accounting procedures. NoA
person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company shallmay not transport or, bring,
Page No. 7 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
or cause to be shipped into thethis state of North Dakota any cigarettes as provided
herein, other than for delivery to wholesalers in this state, without first paying the tax
thereonunder this subsection to the state tax commissioner. All of the moneys
collected by theThe state treasurer shall deposit the funds collected under this section
shall be credited tosubsection into the state general fund.
2. There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner
and paid to the state treasurer, on cigarettes sold in this state, an additional tax,
separate from all other taxes, of fifty - four and one - half mills on each cigarette, to be
collected as existing taxes on cigarettes sold are, or may be, collected, by use of
appropriate stamps and under similar accounting procedures. A person, firm,
corporation, or limited liability company may not transport, bring, or cause to be
shipped into this state any cigarettes as provided under this subsection, other than for
delivery to wholesalers in this state, without first paying the tax under this subsection
to the state tax commissioner. The state treasurer shall deposit:
a. Fifty percent of the funds collected under this subsection into the tobacco tax
distribution behavioral health fund under section 1 of this Act; and
b. Fifty percent of the funds into the state general fund.
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Electronic smoking device - Excise tax on wholesale purchase price - Amount of tax -
Penalty - Reports - Collection .
1. There is levied and assessed upon all electronic smoking devices sold in this state an
excise tax at the rate of fifty - six percent of the wholesale purchase price at which
electronic smoking devices are purchased by distributors. For the purposes of this
section, "wholesale purchase price" means the established price for which a
manufacturer sells an electronic smoking device to a distributor exclusive of any
discount or other reduction.
2. The proceeds of the tax imposed under this section, together with the forms of return
and in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the tax commissioner,
must be remitted to the tax commissioner by the distributor on a calendar quarterly
basis on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the quarterly period for
Page No. 8 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
which paid. The tax commissioner may prescribe monthly returns upon the request of
the licensee distributor and the returns accompanied with remittance must be filed
before the fifteenth day of the month following the month for which the returns are
filed.
3. Any person failing to file any prescribed form or return or to pay any tax within the time
required or permitted by this section is subject to a penalty of five percent of the
amount of tax due or five dollars, whichever is greater, plus interest of one percent of
the tax per month or fraction of a month of delay except the first month after the return
or the tax became due. The tax commissioner, if satisfied that the delay was
excusable, may waive all or part of the penalty. The penalty must be paid to the tax
commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as are other receipts under this
chapter.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Alternative tobacco product - Excise tax on wholesale purchase price - Amount of
tax - Penalty - Reports - Collection .
1. There is levied and assessed upon all alternative tobacco products sold in this state
an excise tax at the rate of fifty - six percent of the wholesale purchase price at which
alternative tobacco products are purchased by distributors. For the purposes of this
section, "wholesale purchase price" means the established price for which a
manufacturer sells an alternative tobacco product to a distributor exclusive of any
discount or other reduction.
2. The proceeds of the tax imposed under this section, together with the forms of return
and in accordance with the rules adopted by the tax commissioner, must be remitted
to the tax commissioner by the distributor on a calendar quarterly basis on or before
the fifteenth day of the month following the quarterly period for which paid. The tax
commissioner may prescribe monthly returns upon the request of the licensee
distributor and the returns accompanied with remittance must be filed before the
fifteenth day of the month following the month for which the returns are filed.
3. Any person failing to file any prescribed form or return or to pay any tax within the time
required or permitted by this section is subject to a penalty of five percent of the
Page No. 9 25.0673.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
amount of tax due or five dollars, whichever is greater, plus interest of one percent of
the tax per month or fraction of a month of delay except the first month after the return
or the tax became due. The tax commissioner, if satisfied that the delay was
excusable, may waive all or part of the penalty. The penalty must be paid to the tax
commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as are other receipts under this
chapter.
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 3, 4, 6, 7, and 8 of this Act are effective for
taxable events occurring after June 30, 2025.
Page No. 10 25.0673.02000